fst/morphology/lexicon.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
! Tags
+V
+II
+AI
+TI
+TA
+Ind
+Cnj
+Cond
+Inf
+Imp
+Imm
+Del
PV/
IC+
+%0
+%0Sg
+%0Pl
+%0Sg/Pl
+1Sg
+2Sg
+3Sg
+1Pl
+21Pl
+2Pl
+3Pl
+4
+4Sg
+4Pl
+4Sg/Pl
+5
+5Sg/Pl
+X
+%0O
+%0SgO
+%0PlO
+%0Sg/PlO
+1SgO
+2SgO
+3SgO
+1PlO
+21PlO
+2PlO
+3PlO
+4O
+4SgO
+4PlO
+4Sg/PlO
+5O
+5Sg/PlO
+XO

RdplS+
RdplW+

+Der/Dim
+Der/Com
+Der/Rflx
+Der/Rcpr
+Der/Caus
+Der/Bnf
+Der/Pass
+Der/Antip
+Der/Dtr
+Der/Trans
+Der/makan
+Der/iwê
+Der/iso
+Der/ito
+Der/ikê
+Der/ikâtê

+Dial
+Orth/Hyp
+Err/Morph
+Err/Orth

! Flags
@D.bound@
@D.class.AI@
@D.class.II@
@D.order.Cond@
@P.bound.Hyph@
@P.bound.h2@
@P.class.AI@
@P.class.II@
@P.class.TA@
@P.class.TI@
@P.comitative.COM@
@P.comitative.NULL@
@P.diminutive.DIM@
@P.order.Cnj@
@P.order.Cond@
@P.order.Imp@
@P.order.Ind@
@P.person.KI@
@P.person.NI@
@P.person.NULL@
@R.bound.h2@
@R.class.AI@
@R.class.II@
@R.class.TA@
@R.class.TI@
@R.comitative.COM@
@R.comitative.NULL@
@R.diminutive.DIM@
@R.order.Cnj@
@R.order.Cond@
@R.order.Imp@
@R.order.Ind@
@R.person.KI@
@R.person.NI@
@R.person.NULL@
@P.number.SG@
@P.number.PL@
@R.number.SG@
@R.number.PL@
@D.number.SG@
@D.number.PL@
@D.number@
@D.diminutive.DIM@
@D.diminutive@
@P.conjunct.CC@
@R.conjunct.CC@
@D.conjunct.CC@
@D.comitative.COM@

@P.err.Orth@
@P.err.Morph@
@R.err.Orth@
@R.err.Morph@
@R.err@
@D.err.Orth@
@D.err.Morph@
@D.err

@P.infl.VII-1v@
@P.infl.VII-1n@
@P.infl.VII-2v@
@P.infl.VII-2n@
@R.infl.VII-1v@
@R.infl.VII-1n@
@R.infl.VII-2v@
@R.infl.VII-2n@

@P.infl.VII-v@
@P.infl.VII-n@
@R.infl.VII-v@
@R.infl.VII-n@

@P.infl.VAI-1@
@P.infl.VAI-2@
@P.infl.VAI-3@
@R.infl.VAI-1@
@R.infl.VAI-2@
@R.infl.VAI-3@

@P.infl.VAI-ae@
@P.infl.VAI-io@
@P.infl.VAI-n@
@P.infl.VAI-m@
@R.infl.VAI-ae@
@R.infl.VAI-io@
@R.infl.VAI-n@
@R.infl.VAI-m@

@P.infl.VTI-1@
@P.infl.VTI-2@
@P.infl.VTI-2@
@R.infl.VTI-1@
@R.infl.VTI-2@
@R.infl.VTI-2@

@P.infl.VTI-m@
@P.infl.VTI-ae@
@P.infl.VTI-io@
@R.infl.VTI-m@
@R.infl.VTI-ae@
@R.infl.VTI-io@
@D.infl.VTI-m@
@D.infl.VTI-ae@
@D.infl.VTI-io@

@P.infl.VTA-1@
@P.infl.VTA-2@
@P.infl.VTA-3@
@P.infl.VTA-4@
@P.infl.VTA-5@
@R.infl.VTA-1@
@R.infl.VTA-2@
@R.infl.VTA-3@
@R.infl.VTA-4@
@R.infl.VTA-5@

@P.infl.VTA@
@R.infl.VTA@
@P.infl.VTA-t@
@R.infl.VTA-t@
@P.infl.VTA-i@
@R.infl.VTA-i@

! Morphemes
@P.morf.amaw@
@D.morf.amaw@

! Special characters
d1
d2
i2
ii2
î2
t2
t3
i3
h2
n2
n3
n4
w2
y2
y3
y4

^IC
^DIM
^COM
^V2VV
^T2C

%<
%>

LEXICON Root
VerbArgClass ;

LEXICON VerbArgClass
@P.class.II@ VerbOrder ;
@P.class.AI@ VerbOrder ;
@P.class.TI@ VerbOrder ;
@P.class.TA@ VerbOrder ;

LEXICON VerbOrder
@P.order.Ind@ IndependentPrefixes  ;
@P.order.Cnj@ ConjunctPreverbs ;
@P.order.Cond@ ConditionalPreverbs ;
@P.order.Imp@ LexicalPreverbGate ;

LEXICON IndependentPrefixes
@D.class.II@@P.person.NI@0:@D.class.II@@P.person.NI@nit2 IndependentPrefixesBound ;
@D.class.II@@P.person.KI@0:@D.class.II@@P.person.KI@kit2 IndependentPrefixesBound ;
@P.person.NULL@ TensePreverbs ;

LEXICON IndependentPrefixesBound
0:%< TensePreverbs ;

LEXICON ConjunctPreverbs
PV/ê+:ê ConjunctPreverbsBound ;
PV/kâ+:kâ ConjunctPreverbsBound ;
PV/ta+:ta TensePreverbsBound ;
PV/ka+:ka TensePreverbsBound ;
@P.err.Morph@ TensePreverbs ;
IC+:^IC LexicalPreverbGate ;

LEXICON ConjunctPreverbsBound
0:-%< TensePreverbs ;

LEXICON ConditionalPreverbs
@P.conjunct.CC@IC+:@P.conjunct.CC@^IC LexicalPreverbGate ;
0 LexicalPreverbGate ;

LEXICON TensePreverbs
0 LexicalPreverbGate ;
PV/kî+:kî TensePreverbsBound ;
PV/wî+:wî TensePreverbsBound ;
PV/kî+PV/wî+:kî-%<wî TensePreverbsBound ;
@R.order.Ind@PV/ka+:@R.order.Ind@ka TensePreverbsBound ;

LEXICON TensePreverbsBound
0:-%< LexicalPreverbGate ;

LEXICON LexicalPreverbGate
0 Reduplication ;
0 LexicalPreverbs ;
0 VerbStems ;

LEXICON Reduplication
RdplW+:d2ay2 ReduplicationBound ;
RdplS+:d2âh  ReduplicationBound ;
RdplW+RdplS+:d2ay2-%<d2âh ReduplicationBound ;
@P.err.Morph@RdplS+RdplW+:@P.err.Morph@d2âh-%<d2ay2 ReduplicationBound ;

LEXICON ReduplicationBound
0:-%< LexicalPreverbs ;
0:-%< VerbStems ;

LEXICON LexicalPreverbs
PV/miyo+:miýo LexicalPreverbsBound ;
@R.class.AI@@D.comitative.COM@@P.comitative.COM@PV/wîci+:@R.class.AI@@D.comitative.COM@@P.comitative.COM@wî^COMt2 LexicalPreverbsBound ;
@R.class.TI@@D.comitative.COM@@P.comitative.COM@PV/wîci+:@R.class.TI@@D.comitative.COM@@P.comitative.COM@wî^COMt2 LexicalPreverbsBound ;

LEXICON LexicalPreverbsBound
0:-%< LexicalPreverbGate ;

! LEXICON ComitativePreverb
! @D.class.AI@@P.comitative.NULL@ VerbStems ;
! @R.class.AI@@P.comitative.NULL@ VerbStems ;
! @R.class.AI@@P.comitative.COM@PV/wîci+:@R.class.AI@@P.comitative.COM@wîci ComitativePreverbBound ;

! LEXICON ComitativePreverbBound
! 0:-%< VerbStems ;

LEXICON VerbStems
@R.class.II@ VII_Stems ;
@R.class.AI@ VAI_Stems ;
@R.class.TI@ VTI_Stems ;
@R.class.TA@ VTA_Stems ;
LEXICON VII_Stems
kîsikâw:kîsikâ VII-v-SG ;
kimiwan:kimiwan3 VII-n-SG ;
@P.diminutive.DIM@kimiwasin:@P.diminutive.DIM@kimiwasin3 VII-n-SG ;
mâyâtan:mâyâtan3 VII-n ; 
mihkwâw:mihkwâ VII-v ;
miywâsin:miywâsin VII-n ;
pimamon:pimamon VII-n ;

LEXICON VAI_Stems
atoskêw:atoskê VAI-ae ;
nipâw:nipâ VAI-ae ;
mâtow:mâto VAI-io ;
mîcisow:mîciso VAI-io ;
pimisin:pimisin3 VAI-n ;
mâham:mâha VAI-m ;
nêhiyawêw:nêhiyawê VAI-ae ;

LEXICON VTI_Stems
kîsihtâw:kîsihtâ VTI-ae ;
mîciw:mîci VTI-io ;
nâtam:nât VTI-m ;
wâpahtam:wâpaht VTI-m ;

LEXICON VTA_Stems
itêw:it3 VTA-i ;
kîskiswêw:kîskisw VTA ;
mowêw:mow2 VTA ;
nakatêw:nakat3 VTA-t ;
nitonawêw:nitonaw VTA ;
wîcihêw:wîcih VTA ;

LEXICON VII-n-SG
@P.infl.VII-n@@P.number.SG@ VII_Diminutive ;

LEXICON VII-v-SG
@P.infl.VII-v@@P.number.SG@ VII_Diminutive ;

LEXICON VII-v
@P.infl.VII-v@ VII_Diminutive ;

LEXICON VII-n
@P.infl.VII-n@ VII_Diminutive ;

LEXICON VAI-ae
@P.infl.VAI-ae@ VAI_Diminutive ;

LEXICON VAI-ae-PL
@P.infl.VAI-ae@@P.number.PL@ VAI_Diminutive ;

LEXICON VAI-io
@P.infl.VAI-io@ VAI_Diminutive ;

LEXICON VAI-io-PL
@P.infl.VAI-io@@P.number.PL@ VAI_Diminutive ;

LEXICON VAI-n
@P.infl.VAI-n@ VAI_Diminutive ;

LEXICON VAI-n-PL
@P.infl.VAI-n@@P.number.PL@ VAI_Diminutive ;

LEXICON VAI-m
@P.infl.VAI-m@ VAI_Diminutive ;

LEXICON VAI-m-PL
@P.infl.VAI-m@@P.number.PL@ VAI_Diminutive ;

! VTI verbs

LEXICON VTI-ae
@P.infl.VTI-ae@ VTI_Diminutive ;

LEXICON VTI-ae-PL
@P.infl.VTI-ae@@P.number.PL@ VTI_Diminutive ;

LEXICON VTI-io
@P.infl.VTI-io@ VTI_Diminutive ;

LEXICON VTI-io-PL
@P.infl.VTI-io@@P.number.PL@ VTI_Diminutive ;

LEXICON VTI-m
@P.infl.VTI-m@ VTI_Diminutive ;

LEXICON VTI-m-PL
@P.infl.VTI-m@@P.number.PL@ VTI_Diminutive ;

! VTA verbs

LEXICON VTA
@P.infl.VTA@ VTA_Diminutive ;

LEXICON VTA-PL
@P.infl.VTA@@P.number.PL@ VTA_Diminutive ;

LEXICON VTA-t
@P.infl.VTA-t@ VTA_Diminutive ;

LEXICON VTA-t-PL
@P.infl.VTA-t@@P.number.PL@ VTA_Diminutive ;

LEXICON VTA-i
@P.infl.VTA-i@ VTA_Diminutive ;

LEXICON VTA-i-PL
@P.infl.VTA-i@@P.number.PL@ VTA_Diminutive ;

! VII derivation -> inflection

LEXICON VII_Diminutive
0 VII_Class ;
@D.diminutive.DIM@@R.infl.VII-n@+V+II+Der/Dim:@D.diminutive.DIM@@R.infl.VII-n@%>s^DIMi VII_Class ;
@D.diminutive.DIM@@R.infl.VII-v@+V+II+Der/Dim:@D.diminutive.DIM@@R.infl.VII-v@%>s^DIMi VII_Class ;

LEXICON VAI_Diminutive
0 VAI_Class ;
@D.diminutive.DIM@@R.infl.VAI-ae@@P.infl.VAI-io@+V+AI+Der/Dim:@D.diminutive.DIM@@R.infl.VAI-ae@@P.infl.VAI-io@%>s^DIMi VAI_Class ;
@D.diminutive.DIM@@R.infl.VAI-io@@P.infl.VAI-io@+V+AI+Der/Dim:@D.diminutive.DIM@@R.infl.VAI-io@@P.infl.VAI-io@%>s^DIMi VAI_Class ;
@D.diminutive.DIM@@R.infl.VAI-n@@P.infl.VAI-io@+V+AI+Der/Dim:@D.diminutive.DIM@@R.infl.VAI-n@@P.infl.VAI-io@%>is^DIMi VAI_Class ;
@D.diminutive.DIM@@R.infl.VAI-m@@P.infl.VAI-io@+V+AI+Der/Dim:@D.diminutive.DIM@@R.infl.VAI-m@@P.infl.VAI-io@%>as^DIMi VAI_Class ;

LEXICON VTI_Diminutive
0 VTI_Class ;
@D.diminutive.DIM@@R.infl.VTI-m@@P.infl.VTI-io@+V+TI+Der/Dim:@D.diminutive.DIM@@R.infl.VTI-m@@P.infl.VTI-io@%>as^DIMi VTI_Class ;
@D.diminutive.DIM@@D.infl.VTI-m@@P.infl.VTI-io@+V+TI+Der/Dim:@D.diminutive.DIM@@D.infl.VTI-m@@P.infl.VTI-io@%>s^DIMi VTI_Class ;

LEXICON VTA_Diminutive
0 VTA_Class ;
@D.diminutive.DIM@+V+TA+Der/Dim:@D.diminutive.DIM@%>s^DIMi VTA_Class ;

LEXICON VII_Class
+V+II:0 VII_Derivation ;

LEXICON VAI_Class
+V+AI:0 VAI_ComitativeTheme ;

LEXICON VTI_Class
+V+TI:0 VTI_ComitativeTheme ;

LEXICON VTA_Class
+V+TA:0 VTA_Derivation ;

LEXICON VAI_ComitativeTheme
@D.comitative.COM@ VAI_Derivation ;
! @R.comitative.NULL@ VAI_Derivation ;
@R.comitative.COM@@P.infl.VTA@+Der/Com:@R.comitative.COM@@P.infl.VTA@%^COM%>i2m VTA_Class ;

LEXICON VTI_ComitativeTheme
@D.comitative.COM@ VTI_Derivation ;
! @R.comitative.NULL@ VTI_Derivation ;
@R.comitative.COM@@R.infl.VTI-m@@P.infl.VTA@+Der/Com:@R.comitative.COM@@R.infl.VTI-m@@P.infl.VTA@%>am%>o^COM%>i2m VTA_Class ;
@R.comitative.COM@@D.infl.VTI-m@@P.infl.VTA@+Der/Com:@R.comitative.COM@@D.infl.VTI-m@@P.infl.VTA@%^COM%>i2m VTA_Class ;

LEXICON VII_Derivation
0 VII_Inflection ;

LEXICON VII_Inflection
@R.order.Ind@@R.person.NULL@+Ind:@R.order.Ind@@R.person.NULL@ VII_IndependentSuffixes ;
@R.order.Cnj@+Cnj:@R.order.Cnj@ VII_ConjunctSuffixes ;
@R.order.Cond@@D.conjunct.CC@+Cond:@R.order.Cond@@D.conjunct.CC@ VII_ConditionalSuffixes ;
@R.order.Cond@@R.conjunct.CC@+Cond+Inf:@R.order.Cond@@R.conjunct.CC@ VII_ConditionalSuffixes ;

LEXICON VII_IndependentSuffixes
@R.infl.VII-v@ VII-v_IndependentSuffixes ;
@R.infl.VII-n@ VII-n_IndependentSuffixes ;

LEXICON VII_ConjunctSuffixes
@R.infl.VII-v@ VII-v_ConjunctSuffixes ;
@R.infl.VII-n@ VII-n_ConjunctSuffixes ;

LEXICON VII_ConditionalSuffixes
@R.infl.VII-v@ VII-v_ConditionalSuffixes ;
@R.infl.VII-n@ VII-n_ConditionalSuffixes ;

LEXICON VII-v_IndependentSuffixes
VII-v_IND_SG ;
@D.number.SG@ VII-v_IND_PL ;

LEXICON VII-v_IND_SG
+3Sg:%>w VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg:%>ýiw VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VII-v_IND_PL
+3Pl:%>w%>a VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Pl:%>ýiw%>a VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VII-v_ConjunctSuffixes
VII-v_CNJ_SG ;
@D.number.SG@ VII-v_CNJ_PL ;

LEXICON VII-v_CNJ_SG
+3Sg:%>k VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg:%>ýik VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VII-v_CNJ_PL
+3Pl:%>k%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Pl:%>ýik%>i VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VII-v_ConditionalSuffixes
VII-v_COND_SG ;
@D.number.SG@ VII-v_COND_PL ;

LEXICON VII-v_COND_SG
+3Sg:%>ki VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg:%>ýiki VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VII-v_COND_PL
+3Pl:%>kwâwi VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Pl:%>ýikwâwi VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VII-n_IndependentSuffixes
VII-n_IND_SG ;
@D.number.SG@ VII-n_IND_PL ;

LEXICON VII-n_IND_SG
+3Sg:0 VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg:%>iýiw VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VII-n_IND_PL
+3Pl:%>wa VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Pl:%>iýiw%>a VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VII-n_ConjunctSuffixes
VII-n_CNJ_SG ;
@D.number.SG@ VII-n_CNJ_PL ;

LEXICON VII-n_CNJ_SG
+3Sg:%>k VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg:%>iýik VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VII-n_CNJ_PL
+3Pl:%>k%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Pl:%>iýik%>i VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VII-n_ConditionalSuffixes
VII-n_COND_SG ;
@D.number.SG@ VII-n_COND_PL ;

LEXICON VII-n_COND_SG
+3Sg:%>ki VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg:%>iýiki VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VII-n_COND_PL
+3Pl:%>kwâwi VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Pl:%>iýikwâwi VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VAI_Derivation
0 VAI_Inflection ;
@P.infl.VII-n@@P.number.SG@+Der/Pass:@P.infl.VII-n@@P.number.SG@%>m^V2VVakan3 VII_Class ; ! VII-1
@P.infl.VTI-m@+Der/Trans:@P.infl.VTI-m@%>st VTI_Class ;
@P.infl.VTA-1@+Der/Bnf:@P.infl.VTA-1@%>staw VTA_Class ;
@P.infl.VTA-1@+Der/Caus:@P.infl.VTA-1@%>h VTA_Class ;

LEXICON VAI_Inflection
@R.order.Ind@+Ind:@R.order.Ind@ VAI_IndependentSuffixes ;
@R.order.Cnj@+Cnj:@R.order.Cnj@ VAI_ConjunctSuffixes ;
@R.order.Cond@@D.conjunct.CC@+Cond:@R.order.Cond@@D.conjunct.CC@ VAI_ConditionalSuffixes ;
@R.order.Cond@@R.conjunct.CC@+Cond+Inf:@R.order.Cond@@R.conjunct.CC@ VAI_ConditionalSuffixes ;
@R.order.Imp@+Imp:@R.order.Imp@ VAI_ImperativeSuffixes ;

LEXICON VAI_IndependentSuffixes
@R.infl.VAI-ae@ VAI-ae_IndependentSuffixes ;
@R.infl.VAI-io@ VAI-io_IndependentSuffixes ;
@R.infl.VAI-n@ VAI-n_IndependentSuffixes ;
@R.infl.VAI-m@ VAI-m_IndependentSuffixes ;

LEXICON VAI-ae_IndependentSuffixes
@R.person.NI@ VAI-ae_IND_1 ;
@R.person.KI@ VAI-ae_IND_2 ;
@R.person.NULL@ VAI-ae_IND_3 ;

LEXICON VAI-ae_IND_1
@D.number.PL@+1Sg:@D.number.PL@%>n2 VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Pl:%>n2ân VERBS_Endlex ;
